Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 562, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payments of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated
from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to the State  Department of Agriculture for the
Oregon Plan, is increased by $846,821 for invasive pest eradication activities.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 562, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 562,
Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the State Department  of Agriculture, for market
access, is decreased by $16,836.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 509, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Bureau of Labor and Industries, is increased  by $275,000 for ap-
prenticeship expansion and diversification efforts.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 506, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the  Employ-
ment Department by sections 2 and 3, chapter 506, Oregon Laws 2017,  but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter 506, Oregon Laws 2017, collected
or received by the Employment Department, for unemployment insurance, business  and
workforce development and workforce and economic research, is increased by $5,574,000 for
enhanced employment services provided to able-bodied adults without dependents.
SECTION 5. (1) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 574, Oregon Laws  2017, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for operations, from fees,
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 1
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the
United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 574, Oregon  Laws
2017, collected or  received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $18,200,000 for shelter capacity and homelessness prevention services provided through
the Emergency Housing Assistance program.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Oregon Housing and Community Services Department by  section 1, chapter 574, Oregon
Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is increased by $5,000,000 for shelter  ca-
pacity and homelessness prevention  services provided through the Emergency Housing As-
sistance program.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 574, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations,  from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds  from the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 574, Oregon Laws
2017, collected or  received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $125,000 for payments associated with the Rent  Guarantee Program pursuant to ORS
456.608.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 574, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from the
United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 574, Oregon  Laws
2017, collected or  received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $150,000 for payments from the Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account  pursuant to ORS
458.667.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for maintenance and emergency  relief programs, is
increased by $4,557,817.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (3), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for the preservation program, is increased by
$19,014,074.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (4), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for the bridge program, is increased by $55,457,715.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 2
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (5), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department  of Transportation, for the operations program, is increased by $39,791,394.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (6), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for the  modernization program, is increased by
$18,000,000.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (7), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for special programs, is increased by $14,584,061.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (8), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation,  for the local government program, is increased by
$14,690,000.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (9), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for driver  and motor vehicle services, is increased by
$450,014.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (11), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for transportation program  development, is increased
by $1,248,970.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 4 (12), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 3
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for public transit, is increased by $52,156,432.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 4 (14), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for transportation safety, is increased by $394,383.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 4 (15), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for central services, is increased by $7,500,125.
SECTION 20. Section 1, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 21, chapter 655,
Oregon Laws 2017, are repealed.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 98, chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and proceeds of bonds issued  pursuant to Article
XI-P of the  Oregon Constitution, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Education, for  matching grants made to school districts for
construction or improvement to school facilities through the Oregon  School Capital Im-
provement Matching program, is increased by $39,312,315.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 372, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Consumer  and Business Services for the Senior
Health Insurance Benefit Assistance program, is increased by $810,000.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,157,514 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal  funds collected or received by the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services, Division of Financial Regulation, for the planning and imple-
mentation of health insurance market reforms.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of State Lands for Common School  Fund programs,
is increased by $155,734 for the expenditure of Wetland Program federal grant funds.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Emergency Board by section 5 (1), chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for allocation to the State Forestry Department, is decreased
by $2,000,000.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for fire protection,  is increased by $26,194,224 for the
payment of emergency firefighting costs, severity resources, district  deductibles and interest
expense associated with the 2017 forest fire season.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 4
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  592, Oregon Laws 2017, collected
or received by the State Forestry  Department, for fire protection, is increased by $22,743,921
for the payment of emergency firefighting costs associated with the 2017 forest fire season.
SECTION 28. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund  appro-
priation made to the Secretary of State by section  1 (1), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for the Administrative Services Division, is increased by
$343,094.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Secretary of State by section 1 (2), chapter 602, Oregon Laws  2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for the Elections Division, is decreased by $375,745.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  2 (1), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the Secretary of State, for the Administrative Services Division, is decreased by
$37,839.
(4) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (3), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Secretary of State, for the Audits Division, is decreased by $49,522.
(5) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  2 (4), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the Secretary of State, for the Archives Division, is decreased by $16,420.
(6) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (5), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Secretary of State, for the Corporation Division, is decreased by $24,073.
(7) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  3, chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received
by the Secretary of State, is increased by $117,889.
SECTION 29.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 580,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for  the
Infrastructure Finance Authority, is  increased by $642,194 for repairing and improving docks
owned by the Port of Brookings Harbor.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  4 (1), chapter 580, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received
by the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, innovation  and trade, is in-
creased by $703,125 for the State Trade Expansion Program.
SECTION 30.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 5
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the  Public Employees Retirement System, for the Central
Administration Division, is increased by $445,794.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (4), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Operations
Division, is decreased by $277,350.
SECTION 32.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Compliance,
Audit and Risk Division, is decreased by $168,444.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (1), chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Appellate Division, is decreased by $25,646.
SECTION 34.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (2), chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Civil Enforcement Division, is increased by $152,705.
SECTION 35.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Oregon Military  Department by section 1 (2), chapter 566, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, for operations, is increased by $251,977 for ex-
penses incurred during the August 2017 solar eclipse.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (3), chapter 566, Oregon Laws  2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for emergency management, is increased by  $8,747 for ex-
penses incurred during the August 2017 solar eclipse.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 566, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
566, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by  the Oregon Military Department, for com-
munity support, is increased by $5,442,829 for expenses incurred during the 2017 fire season
in Oregon.
SECTION 37.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 581, Oregon Laws  2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for patrol services, criminal investigations and gaming
enforcement, is increased by $90,000 for expenses  incurred during the 2017 fire season in
Oregon.
SECTION 38.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, for administrative services, agency support, criminal
justice information services and the office  of the State Fire Marshal, is increased by
$3,165,945 for expenses incurred during the 2017 fire season in Oregon.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 6
funds, collected or received by  the Department of State Police, for administrative services,
agency support, criminal justice information services and the office of the State Fire Mar-
shal, is increased by $12,770,000 for expenses incurred during the 2017 fire season  in Oregon.
SECTION 40.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Long Term Care  Ombudsman by section 1 (1), chapter 579, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for general program and services provided  to
care facility residents, is increased by $28,639.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Long  Term Care Ombudsman by section 1 (2), chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the public guardian and conservator program, is decreased
by $28,639.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter 585, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs, is increased by $500,000 for transporta-
tion of veterans in highly rural areas.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 572, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Operating Office, is increased by  $302,524 for the CASA Volunteer Program and
economic forecasting.
SECTION 43.
 Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 572, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
enterprise asset management, is increased by $8,485,000.
SECTION 44.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimbursement
from the United States Department of Transportation,  but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 2,  chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Environmental Quality, for  permitting and program implementation,
is increased by $18,000,140 for electric vehicle rebate  special payments and greenhouse gas
reporting activities.
SECTION 45. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund  appro-
priation made to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission by section 1 (1), chapter
595, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for commission  operations, is
increased by $425,049 for budget shortfalls related to enterprise technology services  and cli-
ent services.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section  5, chapter 708, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2019, for the purpose of carrying out Oregon’s Open Edu-
cational Resources (OER) Program, is decreased by $360,000.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 6 (1), chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 7
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds
and funds described in sections  9 and 10, chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for operations, is increased  by $11,030 for
budget shortfalls related to enterprise technology services and client services.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 7 (1), chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for operations, is
increased by $198,541 for budget shortfalls related to enterprise technology services  and cli-
ent services.
SECTION 48.
 Section 1, chapter 594, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec 1.  There is  appropriated to the Chief Education Office, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of [ $4,022,118] $8,616,069 for expenses [ incurred during
the first year of the biennium ] of the office .
SECTION 48a. Section 2, chapter 594, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 583, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $623,260 for expenses incurred during the 2017 fire  season in
Oregon.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 583, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $400,000 for crisis intervention training for first responders.
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission, is increased by $450,000 for
implementation of a new case management system for Oregon’s specialty courts.
SECTION 52.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, is increased by $1,045,940 for
grant-funded Justice Reinvestment programs and improving recidivism analysis.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 566, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 566, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Oregon  Military Department, for operations, is increased by $16,421,308 for lead dust
abatement projects at eight armories throughout Oregon.
SECTION 54. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 580,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for business, innovation and trade,  is decreased by
$1,250,000 for the Strategic Reserve Fund.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 8
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of $1,250,000 is es-
tablished for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Administrative Services Economic
Development Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department for business, innovation
and trade, for transfers to the Oregon Growth Fund.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys,  or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund
programs, is increased by $7,244,215 for expenses associated with the cleanup  efforts at the
Goble, Oregon, site on the Columbia River.
SECTION 56.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (4), chapter 547, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation Department, for direct  ser-
vices, is  increased by $200,000 for the eradication and treatment of trees infected with Sud-
den Oak Death within the Cape Sebastian State Scenic Corridor.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Civil Enforcement Division,
is increased by $53,241 for the Medicaid Fraud Unit.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Justice,  for the Civil Enforcement Division, is
increased by $159,723 for the Medicaid Fraud Unit.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for adminis-
tration, is increased by $1,447,475 for the implementation of chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 60.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Business
Division, is increased by $933,316 for implementation of chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 61.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5,  chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from federal service agree-
ments, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 5,  chapter 589,
Oregon Laws  2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the core system
replacement program and the implementation of chapter 750, Oregon Laws  2017, is decreased
by $497,420.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 9
SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for adminis-
tration, is increased by $270,391 for implementation of chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 63.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Business
Division, is increased by $917,305 for implementation of chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 64.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 41, chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for the  core system replace-
ment program from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery  funds and federal
funds not described in section 41, chapter 702, Oregon Laws  2017, collected or received by the
Department of Revenue, is increased by $600,000 for  the implementation of chapter 746,
Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 65.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter 601,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for administration, is increased by $53,884 for  implementation
of chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for adminis-
tration, is increased by $9,509 for implementation of chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 67.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 601,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Personal Tax  and Compliance Division, is increased
by $240,058 for implementation of chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the  Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is increased by $4,899  for implementation of chapter 644,
Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 69.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
established for  the Department of Revenue by section 1 (4), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Business Division, is increased  by $83,285 for
implementation of chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 10
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Business
Division, is increased by $80,019 for implementation of chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 71.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Compliance,
Audit and Risk Division, is increased by $80,000 for an independent actuarial review.
SECTION 72. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Compliance,
Audit and Risk Division, is increased by $176,661 for a security and risk officer position.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (3), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Information
Services Division, is increased by $487,174 for agency operations.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (3), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Information
Services Division, is increased by $200,000 for the Individual Account Program target date
fund expenditure.
SECTION 75.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$108,109 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business
Development Department for general obligation bond debt service.
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $24,302
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Education
for debt service on Article XI-P general obligation bonds.
SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $24,434
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission for debt service on Article XI-G bonds issued for  the benefit of Oregon
Health and Science University.
SECTION 78. For the biennium ending June  30, 2019, expenditures by the Higher Educa-
tion Coordinating Commission from  proceeds of state bonds issued during the period begin-
ning July 1,  2013, and ending June 30, 2015, for the benefit of a public university, pursuant
to agreements between the commission and a public university, are not limited.
SECTION 79. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 11
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for administrative services, is decreased by $32,487.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  3 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds received under cooperative
agreements with or contracts from the Bureau of Reclamation of the United  States Depart-
ment of the Interior, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the  United States
Geological Survey, the Bonneville  Power Administration and the National Fish and Wildlife
Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 3, chapter
606, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Water  Resources Department, for field
services, is increased by $1,109,796.
(3) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  3 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds received under cooperative
agreements with or  contracts from the Bureau of Reclamation of the United States Depart-
ment of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the United States
Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the National  Fish and Wildlife
Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 3, chapter
606, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Water Resources Department, for  water
rights and adjudications, is increased by $303,314.
(4) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  3 (4), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds received under cooperative
agreements with or  contracts from the Bureau of Reclamation of the United States Depart-
ment of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the United States
Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the National  Fish and Wildlife
Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 3, chapter
606, Oregon Laws 2017, collected  or received by the Water Resources Department, for tech-
nical services, is decreased by $1,430,120.
(5) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  3 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds received under cooperative
agreements with or contracts from the Bureau of Reclamation of the United  States Depart-
ment of the Interior, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the  United States
Geological Survey, the Bonneville  Power Administration and the National Fish and Wildlife
Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 3, chapter
606, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Water Resources Department, for  the
director’s office, is increased by $49,497.
(6) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  4 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds other than federal
funds described in section 3, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2017, collected  or received by the
Water Resources Department, for technical services, is decreased by $75,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 12
(7) Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following amounts are es-
tablished for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment of ex-
penses from federal funds other  than federal funds received under cooperative agreements
with or contracts from the Bureau of  Reclamation of the United States Department of the
Interior, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological  Survey,
the Bonneville  Power Administration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, col-
lected or received by the Water Resources Department, for the following purposes:
(a) Administrative services ............ $ 25,000
(b) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 25,000
(c) Director’s office ........................ $ 25,000
SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (2), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for central administration and administrative  services,
is decreased by $746,961.
SECTION 81. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (4), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for community corrections, is decreased by $222,338.
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (3), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for offender management and rehabilitation, is increased
by $469,024.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, for operations and health services, is increased by
$500,275.
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Corrections, for community corrections,
is decreased by $21,990.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Corrections, for operations and  health
services, is increased by  $21,990 for expenses associated with moving a position between work
units.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (3), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for  South Slough National
Estuarine Research  Reserve operations, is increased by $235,081, for the expenditure of Uni-
versity of Michigan grant funding awarded  to the South Slough National Estuarine Research
Reserve.
SECTION 87. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services by section 1, chapter 599, Oregon
Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for debt service on outstanding general
obligation bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-G  of the Oregon Constitution for the benefit of
Oregon Health and Science University, is decreased by $11,785,250.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 13
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services from the  Oregon Health and Science University Bond Fund for
specified purposes, is decreased by $17,177,050.
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services for debt  service on outstanding general obligation bonds issued
pursuant to Article XI-F  (1) of the Oregon Constitution for the benefit of Oregon Health and
Science University and paid with resources received from Oregon Health and  Science Uni-
versity and interest earned on the bonds, is decreased by $4,169,013.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1  (16)(c), chapter 595,
Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution  for the
benefit of Oregon Health and Science University, is increased by $11,760,817.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$17,177,050 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission for debt service and other bond-related costs on Article XI-L bonds
issued for the benefit of Oregon Health and Science University.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,892,874 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service  on
outstanding general obligation bonds issued  pursuant to Article XI-F (1) of the Oregon Con-
stitution for the benefit of Oregon Health and Science University and paid  with resources
received from Oregon Health and Science University and interest earned on the bonds.
SECTION 93. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the limitation on expendi-
tures established by section 2 (3), chapter 572, Oregon  Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from  charges, but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 572, Oregon Laws
2017, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for  policy
within the Office of the State  Chief Information Officer, is increased by $288,399 for a
transfer of positions between programs.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures established
by section 2 (5)(a), chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,  2019, as
the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including
Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges, but  excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not  described in section 2, chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or re-
ceived by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for State Data  Center oper-
ations within the Office of the State Chief Information Officer, is decreased  by $288,399 due
to a transfer of positions between programs.
SECTION 94. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the limitation on expendi-
tures established by section 2 (2), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of  bonds for the Orphan Site Ac-
count and federal funds from congestion mitigation and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, beach bacteria monitoring, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants and for
smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not de-
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 14
scribed in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department
of Environmental Quality, for water quality, is decreased by $272,092.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures established
by section 5 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2017, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2019, as the
maximum limit for  payment of expenses from federal funds other than those described in
section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or  received by the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality, for water quality, is increased by $342,092 for  transfer of a federal grant.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 572 1(5) -117,367
Debt service and
related costs
Lottery funds Ch. 572 3 -421,272
ODAS debt service
Other funds Ch. 572 2(13) +30,729
(2) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business
Development Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 580 1(3) -108,108
(3) EDUCATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 15
Department of Education:
Debt service -
XI-P bonds:
General Fund Ch. 590 8 -24,301
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon
community colleges
General Fund Ch. 595 1(16)(a) -227,591
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon
public universities
General Fund Ch. 595 1(16)(b) -870,472
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-Q of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon
public universities
General Fund Ch. 595
1(16)(d) -1,369,658
Debt service on Article XI-G
and XI-Q bonds issued for the
benefit of Oregon public
universities
Other funds Ch. 595 6(3) +2,240,132
Debt service on Article XI-G
bonds issued for the benefit
of Oregon community colleges
Other funds Ch. 595 6(4) +227,592
(4) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration Committee:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 577 1(2) -48,618
Other funds Ch. 577 2(2) +48,619
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 16
(5) TRANSPORTATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Transportation:
Debt service
Lottery funds Ch. 604 6 -1,008,172
Other funds Ch. 604 4(16) +1,008,173
(6) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 573 1(5) -43,041
SECTION 96. (1) The allocation  to the Department of State Police of moneys deposited
into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund by section 1, chapter 586,  Oregon Laws
2017, for fish and wildlife  activities to implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Con-
stitution, is increased by $76,711.
(2) The allocation to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife of moneys  deposited into
the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund by  section 2, chapter 586, Oregon Laws 2017, for
activities and projects to implement Article  XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution, is
increased by $113,745.
(3) The allocation to the State Department of Agriculture of  moneys deposited into the
Watershed Conservation Operating Fund by section  3, chapter 586, Oregon Laws 2017, for
activities and projects to implement Article XV, section 4b,  of the Oregon Constitution, is
increased by $1,958,477.
(4) The allocation to the Department of Environmental Quality of moneys  deposited into
the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund by  section 4, chapter 586, Oregon Laws 2017, for
activities and projects to implement Article XV, section 4b,  of the Oregon Constitution, is
increased by $122,134.
SECTION 97. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1,  chapter 587, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Watershed  En-
hancement Board  from lottery moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Grant
Fund from the Parks and Natural  Resources Fund, for local grant expenditure purposes
listed in Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution, is increased by $5,000,000.
SECTION 98. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services by section 18b (1), chapter 630,
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 17
Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the purpose of administering
and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 12, chapter 630, Oregon
Laws 2017, is increased by $438,465.
SECTION 99. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 572,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 572, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer, is increased by $2,500,000 for the  purchase
of fiber network.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (5)(a), chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June
30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or  other reven-
ues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 572, Oregon  Laws 2017,
collected or received by the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for State Data
Center operations within the Office of  the State Chief Information Officer, is increased by
$779,157 for assimilation of the Oregon Youth Authority data center.
(3) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (7), chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds received from charges, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 572, Oregon  Laws 2017,
collected or received by  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for enterprise
goods and services, is increased by $152,247 for the transfer of procurement staff.
SECTION 100.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Department of Environmental  Quality by section 1 (4), chapter 591,
Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for agency management, is in-
creased by $1,083,217 for information technology.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Environmental  Quality by section 1 (5), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for debt service, is increased by $833,867.
(3) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (4), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan Site Account and
federal funds from congestion mitigation and air quality grants, drinking water protection,
beach bacteria monitoring, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants  and for smoke
monitoring laboratory services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described
in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received  by the Department of En-
vironmental Quality, for agency management, is  increased by $2,965,300 for bond proceeds
and cost of issuance.
SECTION 101.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter 544, Oregon
Laws 2017, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, for the Fish Division, is increased by
$350,000 for the operation of the Leaburg Fish Hatchery.
SECTION 102. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  583, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training, for
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 18
operations, is increased by $3,657,838 for the addition of  six classes to the 2017-2019 Public
Safety Academy training calendar.
SECTION 103.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter 566, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for emergency  management, is increased by
$1,590,544 for administrative expenses.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for patrol services, criminal investigations and gaming
enforcement, is decreased by $1,424,506 for realigning positions between program units.
SECTION 105.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (2), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for fish and wildlife enforcement, is increased by
$114,144 for realigning positions between program units.
SECTION 106.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (3), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, for forensic services and the State Medical Examiner,
is increased by $146,904 for realigning positions between program units.
SECTION 107.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for administrative services, agency support, criminal
justice information services and the office of the State  Fire Marshal, is increased by
$4,139,016 for realigning positions between program units.
SECTION 108.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (2), chapter  372, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Workers’ Compensation Division, is increased by $29,520 for the  reclassification of positions
in the division.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  1 (5), chapter 372, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Consumer and  Business Services, for the Division of Financial
Regulation, is increased by $88,872 for the reclassification of positions in the division.
SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 375,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund
programs, is increased by $410,102 for position actions.
SECTION 110.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 590, Oregon Laws  2017,
for the  biennium ending June 30, 2019, for operations, is increased by $1,980,708 for staffing
for the Office of Child Care and for testing for lead in drinking water in day care facilities.
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter  373, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Occupational  Therapy Licensing Board, is increased by $24,000
for fingerprint background checks for new applicants.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 19
SECTION 112. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5, chapter  373, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the  State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and
Audiology, is increased by $131,158 for increased costs related to investigations.
SECTION 113.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6, chapter  373, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board, is  increased
by $46,111 for costs related to veterinary facility inspection.
SECTION 114.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter  578, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for administrative
expenses, is increased by $677,175 for information  technology improvements, management
and oversight.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  1 (2), chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for marijuana regulation,  is increased
by $3,631,786 for expenses related to the regulation of marijuana.
SECTION 115. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 127, chapter  702, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery funds  al-
located from the Veterans’ Services Fund to the Housing and  Community Services Depart-
ment for the purpose of providing emergency housing assistance to  veterans, is increased
by $1,150,000 for activities to address veterans’ homelessness and housing stability.
SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (10), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department  of Transportation, for motor carrier transportation, is increased by
$979,439.
SECTION 117. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 95, Oregon Laws  2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Department of Aviation, for operations, is in-
creased by $950,000.
SECTION 118. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (1), chapter 545, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for programs, is decreased by $31,921,099.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter 545, Oregon Laws  2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for central  services, statewide assessments and enterprise-
wide costs, is decreased by $136,597.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 20
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Oregon Health Authority  by section 1 (4), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for debt service, is decreased by $1,370,485.
SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 11, chapter 721, Oregon  Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $10,195,935.
SECTION 120. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 2, chapter 695, Oregon Laws  2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $400,000.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 5, chapter 540, Oregon Laws  2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $50,000.
SECTION 122. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 30, chapter 613, Oregon  Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $250,000.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 4, chapter 652, Oregon Laws  2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $557,600.
SECTION 124. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 545,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax  receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider  taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries, Women,  Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described in section 2,
chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
programs, is increased by $60,595,053.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (2), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational marijuana tax receipts,
provider taxes, Medicare  receipts and federal funds for indirect cost recovery, Supplemental
Security Income recoveries, Women, Infants and  Children Program food rebates, the Coor-
dinated School Health  Program, the Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local Law Enforce-
ment Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and response  services, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 545, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for central services,
statewide assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is decreased by $904,109.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  2 (4), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational marijuana  tax receipts,
provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds for indirect cost  recovery, Supplemental
Security Income recoveries, Women, Infants and Children  Program food rebates, the Coor-
dinated School Health Program, the Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local  Law Enforce-
ment Assistance Grant  Program and emergency preparedness and response services, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 545, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority, for capital improvement,
is increased by $43,119.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 21
(4) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of $1,371,293 is es-
tablished for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, recreational marijuana  tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, Infants
and Children Program food  rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the Edward
Byrne Memorial State and Local Law Enforcement  Assistance Grant Program and emer-
gency preparedness and response services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this subsection, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for debt
service.
SECTION 125.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter  545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 545,  Oregon Laws 2017, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for programs, is increased by $242,980,723.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  4 (2), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds, excluding federal
funds described in section 2, chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, collected  or received by the
Oregon Health Authority, for central  services, statewide assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is decreased by $5,183,355.
SECTION 126. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 545, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30,  2019, for programs, is increased by $152,500 for tech-
nical support related to residential mental health rates.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  4 (1), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal
funds described in section 2,  chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the
Oregon Health Authority, for programs, is increased  by $152,500 for technical support related
to residential mental health rates.
SECTION 127. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of the  Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to  be allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for
mental health residential rate increases.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  545, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for programs, is increased by $950,000 for school-based
mental health services.
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 545,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax  receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider  taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries, Women,  Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described in section 2,
chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 22
programs, is increased by $10,000,000 for expenditures from the Health Care  Provider Incen-
tive Fund.
SECTION 130. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $30,000,000, to be allocated to the  Oregon Health Authority or the
Department of Human  Services for caseload costs or other budget challenges that the agency
is unable to mitigate.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 131. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made  to the Emergency Board by section 3 (1), chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for allocation to  the Long Term Care Ombudsman for
costs associated with the public guardian  and conservator program, is decreased by $200,000.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Long  Term Care Ombudsman by section 1 (2), chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the  public guardian and conservator program, is increased
by $200,000.
SECTION 132. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund,  the amount of $300,000, to be allocated to the Department of Human Services for
caseload costs or ventilator-assisted services in nursing facilities.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 133. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 3 (1), chapter 702, Oregon  Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for  allocation to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees,  is decreased by
$10,000,000.
SECTION 134. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 5 (1), chapter 597, Oregon  Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for allocation to the Department of Human Services for foster
parent supports, is decreased by $750,000.
SECTION 135. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, for the Department of
Human Services, are changed by the amounts specified:
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Central services and
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs
General Fund Ch. 597 1(1) +12,936,100
Other funds Ch. 597 2(1) +217,083
Federal funds Ch. 597 3(1) +13,405,396
Child welfare, self-
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 23
sufficiency and vocational
rehabilitation services
General Fund Ch. 597 1(2) +57,899,144
Other funds Ch. 597 2(2) +7,841,400
Federal funds Ch. 597 3(2) +127,287,407
Aging and people with
disabilities and
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs
General Fund Ch. 597 1(3) -7,005,894
Other funds Ch. 597 2(3) +33,172,224
Federal funds Ch. 597 3(3) -55,274,546
Shared services
Other funds Ch. 597 2(4) +11,367,375
SECTION 136. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 33, chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 33, chap-
ter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for the child
support enforcement automated  system in the child support enforcement automated pro-
gram, is increased by $2,758,537  for the child support enforcement automated system infor-
mation technology project.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 35, chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, for the  biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses for the costs of issuance of general
obligation bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution from fees, moneys
or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal ser-
vice agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 35,
chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the  Department of Justice, for the
capital debt service and related costs program for the child support  enforcement automated
system in the debt service and related costs program, is increased by $56,463.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 36, chapter  702, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses for the child support enforcement au-
tomated system in the  child support enforcement automated program from federal funds,
other than those described  in section 33, chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Justice, is increased by  $5,398,887 for the child support enforcement
automated system information technology project.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Justice by section 1 (7), chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2017, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for debt service  and related costs, is decreased by $23,047 for capital
debt service and related costs for outstanding general obligation bonds  sold pursuant to Ar-
ticle XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for the child support enforcement automated system.
SECTION 137.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (3), chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for  the Criminal Justice Division, is increased by $185,916
for election fraud violations.
SECTION 138. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter  576, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 24
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the General Counsel Division,
is increased by $1,277,744.
SECTION 139. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2019, for administration, is decreased by $604,613 for the
Processing Modernization information technology project.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  2 (1), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from  federal service agreements, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 601, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received  by the Department of Revenue, for administration, is de-
creased by $52,575 for the Processing Modernization information technology project.
SECTION 140. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for adminis-
tration, is increased by $50,000  for the Processing Modernization information technology
project.
SECTION 141.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, for administration, is increased by $604,613 for finan-
cial and program management staffing.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (1), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limits for  payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements  from federal service agreements, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 601, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received  by the Department of Revenue, for administration, is in-
creased by $52,575 for financial and program management staffing.
SECTION 142. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation established for the Department of Revenue by section  1 (1), chapter 601, Oregon
Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for administration, is increased by  $824,926
for post-core systems replacement project implementation and Research Section staff.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  2 (1), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from  federal service agreements, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 601, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for administration, is in-
creased by $9,115 for post-core systems replacement  project implementation and Research
Section staff.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for the Personal Tax and Compliance Division, is decreased by $586,696
for post-core systems replacement project implementation and Research Section staff.
(4) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (3), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 25
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements  from federal service agreements, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 601, Oregon
Laws 2017,  collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the Personal Tax and
Compliance Division, is decreased by $11,973 for post-core systems replacement project im-
plementation and Research Section staff.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation estab-
lished for the Department of Revenue by section 1  (4), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Business  Division, is decreased by $239,640 for
post-core Systems Replacement project implementation and Research Section staff.
SECTION 143.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Business
Division, is increased by $184,140 for a collections division administrator.
SECTION 144.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Treasurer by section 1 (2), chapter  605, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for administrative expenses related  to the Oregon Retirement
Savings Board, is increased by $1,834,033.
SECTION 145. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission by section 1 (1), chapter
595, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for operations, is increased
by $250,000 for the activities of the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and
Service.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 7 (1), chapter 595, Oregon Laws  2017, as the maximum limit for pay-
ment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by  the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission, for operations, is increased by $3,606,774  for the activities of the Oregon
Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service.
SECTION 146. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Office of the Governor by  section 5, chapter 593, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for  the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary
Action and Service program, is increased by $50,000.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 6, chapter 593, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending  June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received
by the Office of the Governor,  for the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action
and Service program, is decreased by $3,337,261.
SECTION 147.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (1), chapter 577,
Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for the general program, is in-
creased by $609,885.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (1), chapter 577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Legislative Administration Committee, for the  general program, is increased
by $151,550 for costs of issuance of general obligation bonds.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 26
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Legislative Assembly  by section 6, chapter 577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $375,000.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Legislative Assembly by section 7  (1), chapter 577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, is increased by $380,565.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Legislative Assembly by section 7  (2), chapter 577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $380,565.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Legislative Counsel Committee by section  10, chapter 577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $375,000.
(7) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 11, chapter  577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Legislative Counsel Committee, is increased by $250,000.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Legislative Policy and Research Committee by section 14, chapter 577,  Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is increased by $840,115.
SECTION 148. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (2), chapter 544, Oregon
Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Wildlife Division,  is increased by
$50,000 for culling the elk herd near the Cold Springs National Wildlife Refuge.
SECTION 149. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (1), chapter 591, Oregon
Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for air quality,  is increased by $1,000,000
for air quality permitting.
SECTION 150. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there are ap-
propriated to the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Bradshaw Drop Irrigation
Canal Project ............................ $ 1,895,000
(2) National Urban Housing
and Economic Community
Development Corporation
for implementation of an
affordable homes, skills
training and jobs program
for unemployed prior
offenders, at-risk youth
and veterans ............................. $ 1,100,000
(3) City of Maupin Civic
Center project ........................... $ 1,000,000
(4) Chamber of Commerce
facility in Hermiston ................. $ 1,000,000
(5) City of Maupin
fiber project .............................. $ 500,000
(6) City of Milwaukie Ledding
Library expansion project ......... $ 300,000
(7) The Gem Theater regional
art center project ..................... $ 300,000
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 27
(8) Benton County ranked choice
voting pilot project ................... $ 200,000
(9) Study of the Silvies River
and its drainages....................... $ 100,000
SECTION 151. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses from lottery bond proceeds  and other revenues, including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Trillium Family Services
for construction of a secure
adolescent inpatient facility at
Trillium Children’s Farm Home $ 3,058,514
(2) De Paul Treatment Centers
for construction of a new
treatment facility ...................... $ 2,050,587
SECTION 152.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of
$500,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for the Oregon
Infrastructure Finance Authority, for distributions to the City of Warrenton for the purpose
of financing the rebuilding of a dock destroyed by fire in Warrenton, Oregon.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $500,000 is es-
tablished for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Administrative Services Economic
Development Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for business, inno-
vation and  trade, for deposits in the Local Economic Opportunity Fund created by ORS
285B.260.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $500,000 is es-
tablished for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit  for payment of ex-
penses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic
Development Fund to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for the Oregon
Infrastructure Finance Authority, for  distribution to the Port of Cascade Locks for the
purpose of financing infrastructure and business recruitment at the port’s business park.
SECTION 153.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Judicial Department by section 1  (1), chapter 575, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for judicial compensation, is increased by $735,683.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Judicial Department by section 1  (2), chapter 575, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for operations, is increased by $2,378,568.
SECTION 154. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by  section 1 (2), chapter 582,
Oregon Laws 2017, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2019, for professional services, is in-
creased by $1,340,000 to  expand the Parent Child Representation Program to additional
counties.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of  the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount  of $450,000 for the purposes of an Oregon-specific caseload standards
study and an assessment of Oregon public defense services.
SECTION 155. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Secretary of State by section  1 (1), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2017, for
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 28
the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for the Administrative Services Division, is increased by
$156,357 for improving the security of electronic elections systems.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Secretary of State by section 1 (2), chapter 602, Oregon Laws  2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for the Elections Division, is increased by $257,306  for notification
mailings required in the Oregon Motor Voter program.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Secretary of State, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of the General Fund, the
amount of $1,663,885, for the Elections Division and  county costs of conducting the January
2018 special election.
(4) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (1), chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Secretary of State,  for the Administrative Services Division, is increased by
$139,367 for Human Resources Division staffing.
SECTION 156.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of the  Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $1,656,115, to be allocated to the Secretary of State for  the
Elections Division and county costs of conducting the January 2018 special election.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the  Emergency Board prior to August 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on that date become
available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 157. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Office of the Governor by  section 1, chapter 593, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is increased by $222,002 for an education policy advisor.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Office of the Governor, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, out of the General Fund, the
amount of $230,772 for a census coordinator.
SECTION 158. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for programs, is increased by $900,000 for the expan-
sion of the Oregon Psychiatric Access Line program.
SECTION 159. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  545, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, for programs, is increased by $150,000 for a Marion
County sobering center.
SECTION 160. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (10), chapter  595,
Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, for public university statewide
programs, is  increased by $250,000 for the Center for Violence Prevention Research, Educa-
tion, and Practice.
SECTION 161. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (10), chapter  595,
Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June  30, 2019, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $3,000,000 for the Northwest National Marine Renewable  Energy
Center.
SECTION 162. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (1), chapter  595, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds
and funds described in sections  9 and 10, chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 29
by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for operations, is increased  by $1,219,645
for the costs of issuing bonds on behalf of public universities.
SECTION 163. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 590,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses, other than expenses
described in sections 6 and 10, chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2017, from fees, moneys  or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Department  of Education, for operations, is increased by $750,000
for child care worker professional development.
SECTION 164.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 564, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the State School Fund, is decreased by $70,961,313.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 2, chapter 564, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending  June 30,
2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the
Administrative Services Economic Development  Fund to the Department of Education for
the State School Fund is increased by $70,961,313.
SECTION 165. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $200,000 for the  purpose of providing shelter
and respite services within the City of Salem for homeless and unaccompanied minors.
SECTION 166. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Personal Tax and Compliance Division, is in-
creased by $524,929 for a remote customer service call center.
SECTION 167.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
601, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the  Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is increased by  $10,713 for a remote customer service call
center.
SECTION 168.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for administration,  is increased by $772,818 for posi-
tion reconciliation.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  2 (1), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from  federal service agreements, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 601, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for administration, is in-
creased by $73,677 for position reconciliation.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Revenue by section 1 (2), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for the Property Tax  Division, is decreased by $22,093 for position re-
conciliation.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for the  Personal Tax and Compliance Division, is increased by $130,326
for position reconciliation.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 30
(5) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (3), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements  from federal service agreements, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 601, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the Personal Tax  and
Compliance Division, is increased by $2,781 for position reconciliation.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Revenue by section 1 (4), chapter  601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, for the Business Division, is  increased by $47,600 for position reconcil-
iation.
(7) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  2 (4), chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from  federal service agreements, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 601, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by  the Department of Revenue, for the Business Division,
is increased by $115,746 for position reconciliation.
SECTION 169. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of the  Gen-
eral Fund, the amount  of $650,000, to be allocated to the Department of Revenue for position
reconciliation for the biennium ending June 30, 2019.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 170. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$43,042 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for pay-
ment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Department of Cor-
rections, for debt service.
SECTION 171.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for administrative services, is increased by $5,269,633 for  payment of project costs and bond
issuance costs for the City of Carlton water loss reduction  project from the Water Supply
Development Account established by ORS 541.656.
SECTION 172. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 2 (1), chapter 702, Oregon  Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $100,000,000.
SECTION 173. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,435,000 for a carbon policy office.
SECTION 174. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (4), chapter 590, Oregon Laws  2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for other K-12 grant-in-aid  programs, is increased by
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 31
$250,000 for the Mike McLaran Center for Student  Success in the Salem-Keizer School Dis-
trict.
SECTION 175. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the  State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 592, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for fire protection, is increased by $500,000 for
subsidizing forest patrol assessments on east side, low-productivity woodlands.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (2), chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from  the United States Forest
Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in section 2, chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2017,  collected or received by the
State Forestry  Department, for fire protection, is decreased by $500,000 for forest patrol as-
sessments on east side, low-productivity woodlands.
SECTION 176.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  547, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to the  State Parks and Recreation
Department, for community support grants, is increased by $20,000 for grants to  repair rec-
reational trails damaged in the Chetco Bar Fire.
SECTION 177. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Land Conservation and Development by section 1 (2),
chapter 565, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2019, for grant programs,
is increased by  $300,000 for the purpose of providing technical assistance grants to eastern
Oregon counties for economic opportunity analyses.
SECTION 178. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter 597, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for child welfare, self-sufficiency and  vocational
rehabilitation services, is increased by $300,000 for distribution to the  Oregon Food Bank for
cold storage infrastructure improvements.
SECTION 179. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $2,500,000, to  be allocated to the Department of Human Services
for the child welfare program.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 180. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy
Commissions Office:
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 32
General Fund Ch. 370 1 +23,666
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
General Fund Ch. 572 1(1) +47,052
General Fund Ch. 720 11 +9,290
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(1) +301,411
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(2) +402,965
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(3) +851,607
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(4) +619,042
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(5)(a) +999,935
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(6) +863,080
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(7) +1,440,817
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(8) +71,799
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(9) +71,328
State Treasurer:
General Fund Ch. 605 1(1) +4,997
General Fund Ch. 605 1(2) +31,688
Other Funds Ch. 605 2(1) +1,576,487
Other Funds Ch. 605 2(2) +9,386
Oregon Racing Commission:
Other Funds Ch. 58 1 +69,203
Public Employees
Retirement System:
Other Funds Ch. 600 1(1) +186,427
Other Funds Ch. 600 1(2) +431,660
Other Funds Ch. 600 1(3) +371,668
Other Funds Ch. 600 1(4) +977,615
Other Funds Ch. 600 1(5) +98,970
Secretary of State:
General Fund Ch. 602 1(1) +87,479
General Fund Ch. 602 1(2) +90,198
Other Funds Ch. 602 2(1) +286,551
Other Funds Ch. 602 2(3) +557,946
Other Funds Ch. 602 2(4) +128,556
Other Funds Ch. 602 2(5) +187,471
Federal Funds Ch. 602 3 +42,890
Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
Other Funds Ch. 578 1(1) +1,360,597
Other Funds Ch. 578 1(2) +347,431
Department of Revenue:
General Fund Ch. 601 1(1) +931,793
General Fund Ch. 601 1(2) +339,034
General Fund Ch. 601 1(3) +2,292,740
General Fund Ch. 601 1(4) +542,704
Other Funds Ch. 601 2(1) +126,635
Other Funds Ch. 601 2(3) +43,868
Other Funds Ch. 601 2(4) +538,002
Other Funds Ch. 601 2(5) +109,015
Other Funds Ch. 601 2(7) +26,986
Employment Relations Board:
General Fund Ch. 507 1 +64,945
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 33
Other Funds Ch. 507 2 +6,258
Other Funds Ch. 507 3 +49,434
Office of Governor:
General Fund Ch. 593 1 +209,570
Lottery Funds Ch. 593 3 +34,849
Other Funds Ch. 593 4 +91,481
Federal Funds Ch. 593 6 +14,633
Oregon Government
Ethics Commission:
Other Funds Ch. 116 1 +53,441
State Library:
General Fund Ch. 510 1 +69,915
Other Funds Ch. 510 2 +3,280
Other Funds Ch. 510 3 +121,135
Federal Funds Ch. 510 4 +34,544
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of
Accountancy:
Other Funds Ch. 90 1 +33,545
Construction Contractors
Board:
Other Funds Ch. 261 1 +314,171
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
 and Therapists:
Other Funds Ch. 262 1 +40,604
Oregon Board of
Psychology:
Other Funds Ch. 262 2 +6,542
State Board of
Chiropractic Examiners:
Other Funds Ch. 96 1 +13,761
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Other Funds Ch. 371 1 +20,231
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Other Funds Ch. 97 1 +51,753
Health-related
licensing boards:
Other Funds Ch. 373 1 +39,549
Other Funds Ch. 373 2 +9,490
Other Funds Ch. 373 3 +7,097
Other Funds Ch. 373 4 +12,039
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 34
Other Funds Ch. 373 5 +8,907
Other Funds Ch. 373 6 +15,586
Bureau of Labor and
Industries:
General Fund Ch. 509 1 +341,885
Other Funds Ch. 509 2 +127,475
Other Funds Ch. 509 3(1) +111,310
Federal Funds Ch. 509 4 +38,949
Public Utility Commission:
Other Funds Ch. 93 1(1) +471,104
Other Funds Ch. 93 1(2) +54,218
Other Funds Ch. 93 1(3) +260,535
Other Funds Ch. 93 1(4) +5,566
Federal Funds Ch. 93 2 +27,131
Department of Consumer
and Business Services:
Other Funds Ch. 372 1(1) +443,827
Other Funds Ch. 372 1(2) +1,002,158
Other Funds Ch. 372 1(3) +826,759
Other Funds Ch. 372 1(4) +841,910
Other Funds Ch. 372 1(5) +958,887
Other Funds Ch. 372 1(6) +1,964,137
Other Funds Ch. 372 2(1) +148,272
Federal Funds Ch. 372 4(1) +348,460
Federal Funds Ch. 372 4(2) +10,088
Federal Funds Ch. 372 4(3) +8,751
Federal Funds Ch. 372 4(4) +2,523
Real Estate Agency:
Other Funds Ch. 59 1 +160,129
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Other Funds Ch. 126 1 +252,092
Oregon Medical Board:
Other Funds Ch. 125 1 +244,562
State Board of Pharmacy:
Other Funds Ch. 92 1 +129,211
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business
Development Department:
General Fund Ch. 580 1(1) +15,246
General Fund Ch. 580 1(2) +10,191
Other Funds Ch. 580 2(1) +155,036
Other Funds Ch. 580 2(2) +149,960
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 35
Other Funds Ch. 580 2(3) +42,963
Other Funds Ch. 580 2(4) +58,615
Lottery Funds Ch. 580 3(1) +152,514
Lottery Funds Ch. 580 3(2) +148,313
Lottery Funds Ch. 580 3(5) +13,116
Federal Funds Ch. 580 4(1) +3,338
Federal Funds Ch. 580 4(2) +27,926
Federal Funds Ch. 580 4(3) +5,535
Housing and Community
Services Department:
General Fund Ch. 574 1 +55,021
Other Funds Ch. 574 2 +774,097
Federal Funds Ch. 574 4 +124,414
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
General Fund Ch. 585 1(1) +187,515
Lottery Funds Ch. 585 2(1) +206,243
Other Funds Ch. 585 3(1) +208,976
Employment Department:
Other Funds Ch. 506 1(1) +2,220,611
Other Funds Ch. 506 1(2) +565,360
Federal Funds Ch. 506 4 +3,717,268
(4) EDUCATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Other Funds Ch. 584 1 +144,940
Department of Education:
General Fund Ch. 590 1(1) +1,306,196
General Fund Ch. 590 1(2) +294,628
Other Funds Ch. 590 3(1) +495,428
Other Funds Ch. 590 3(2) +49,688
Federal Funds Ch. 590 4(1) +1,113,205
Federal Funds Ch. 590 4(2) +1,074
Chief Education Office:
General Fund Ch. 594 1 -39,492
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
General Fund Ch. 595 1(1) +362,423
Other Funds Ch. 595 6(1) +288,607
Other Funds Ch. 595 6(2) +13,920
Federal Funds Ch. 595 7(1) +309,274
Federal Funds Ch. 595 7(2) +699
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 36
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care
Ombudsman:
General Fund Ch. 579 1(1) +72,097
General Fund Ch. 579 1(2) +41,832
Other Funds Ch. 579 2 +13,815
Commission for the
Blind:
General Fund Ch. 555 1 +109,015
Other Funds Ch. 555 2 +7,016
Federal Funds Ch. 555 3 +272,984
Psychiatric Security
Review Board:
General Fund Ch. 411 1 +81,506
Department of Human
Services:
General Fund Ch. 597 1(1) +2,370,336
General Fund Ch. 597 1(2) +16,127,597
General Fund Ch. 597 1(3) +5,459,568
Other Funds Ch. 597 2(1) +152,447
Other Funds Ch. 597 2(2) +45,946
Other Funds Ch. 597 2(3) +99,939
Other Funds Ch. 597 2(4) +3,494,937
Federal Funds Ch. 597 3(1) +2,069,299
Federal Funds Ch. 597 3(2) +15,861,631
Federal Funds Ch. 597 3(3) +7,716,216
Oregon Health Authority:
General Fund Ch. 545 1(1) +16,021,457
General Fund Ch. 545 1(2) +2,122,044
Other Funds Ch. 545 2(1) +2,209,004
Other Funds Ch. 545 2(2) +416,038
Other Funds Ch. 545 2(3) +3,675,633
Lottery Funds Ch. 545 3(1) +41,793
Federal Funds Ch. 545 4(1) +4,793,180
Federal Funds Ch. 545 4(2) +897,078
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 37
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
General Fund Ch. 91 1(1) +1,159
Judicial Department:
General Fund Ch. 575 1(1) +808,020
General Fund Ch. 575 1(2) +3,509,159
General Fund Ch. 575 1(3) +55,132
Other Funds Ch. 575 2(1) +395,116
Other Funds Ch. 575 2(2) +1,280
Other Funds Ch. 575 2(3) +26,913
Federal Funds Ch. 575 3 +4,937
Public Defense Services
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 582 1(1) +166,732
General Fund Ch. 582 1(3) +38,789
Other Funds Ch. 582 2(2) +13,630
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Fund Ch. 577 1(1) +181,080
Other Funds Ch. 577 2(1) +14,027
Legislative Assembly:
General Fund Ch. 577 6 +191,540
General Fund Ch. 577 7(1) +257,176
General Fund Ch. 577 7(2) +517,258
Legislative Counsel Committee:
General Fund Ch. 577 10 +151,576
Other Funds Ch. 577 11 +17,079
Legislative Fiscal Officer:
General Fund Ch. 577 13(1) +47,803
Other Funds Ch. 577 13(2) +36,897
Legislative Revenue Officer:
General Fund Ch. 577 15 +27,665
Commission on Indian
Services:
General Fund Ch. 577 16 +5,035
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
General Fund Ch. 577 14 +215,909
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 38
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Other Funds Ch. 299 1(1) +145,490
Other Funds Ch. 299 1(2) +22,713
Other Funds Ch. 299 1(3) +32,610
Other Funds Ch. 299 1(4) +17,834
Federal Funds Ch. 299 2(3) +2,272
State Department of
Energy:
Other Funds Ch. 543 1 +402,655
Federal Funds Ch. 543 3 +42,762
State Department of Geology
and Mineral Industries:
General Fund Ch. 508 1 +78,781
Other Funds Ch. 508 2(1) +41,967
Other Funds Ch. 508 2(2) +51,702
Federal Funds Ch. 508 3 +102,942
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Other Funds Ch. 547 1(1) +9,910
Other Funds Ch. 547 1(2) +134,633
Other Funds Ch. 547 1(3) -1,269
Other Funds Ch. 547 1(4) +922,377
Other Funds Ch. 547 1(5) +21,862
General Fund Ch. 678 5 +9,835
Lottery Funds Ch. 547 2(1) +16,880
Lottery Funds Ch. 547 2(2) +214,237
Lottery Funds Ch. 547 2(3) +40,618
Lottery Funds Ch. 547 2(4) +1,167,677
Lottery Funds Ch. 547 2(5) +91,478
Federal Funds Ch. 547 4(2) +7,588
Federal Funds Ch. 547 4(3) +24,491
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund Ch. 536 1 +25,506
Water Resources Department:
General Fund Ch. 606 1(1) +39,499
General Fund Ch. 606 1(2) +264,179
General Fund Ch. 606 1(3) +86,396
General Fund Ch. 606 1(4) +186,767
General Fund Ch. 606 1(5) +90,336
Other Funds Ch. 606 3(1) +14,342
Other Funds Ch. 606 3(2) +61,195
Other Funds Ch. 606 3(3) +112,990
Other Funds Ch. 606 3(4) +100,332
Federal Funds Ch. 606 4(1) +21,086
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 39
Federal Funds Ch. 606 4(2) +5,297
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Lottery Funds Ch. 586 5 +174,369
Federal Funds Ch. 586 7(1) +87,762
Department of State Lands:
Other Funds Ch. 375 1(1) +553,792
Other Funds Ch. 375 1(2) +10,957
Other Funds Ch. 375 1(3) +56,931
Federal Funds Ch. 375 2(1) +48,996
State Department of
Agriculture:
General Fund Ch. 562 1(1) +19,490
General Fund Ch. 562 1(2) +294,561
General Fund Ch. 562 1(3) +72,307
General Fund Ch. 562 1(4) +5,553
Other Funds Ch. 562 2(1) +206,905
Other Funds Ch. 562 2(2) +1,141,687
Other Funds Ch. 562 2(3) +112,748
Other Funds Ch. 562 2(4) +104,890
Lottery Funds Ch. 562 3 +50,741
Federal Funds Ch. 562 4(2) +96,835
Federal Funds Ch. 562 4(3) +58,474
Federal Funds Ch. 562 4(4) +7,470
Department of Environmental
Quality:
General Fund Ch. 591 1(1) +270,996
General Fund Ch. 591 1(2) +499,137
General Fund Ch. 591 1(3) +39,660
General Fund Ch. 591 1(4) +21,762
Other Funds Ch. 591 2(1) +739,186
Other Funds Ch. 591 2(2) +554,481
Other Funds Ch. 591 2(3) +800,523
Other Funds Ch. 591 2(4) +436,228
Lottery Funds Ch. 591 3 +122,134
Federal Funds Ch. 591 5(1) +133,208
Federal Funds Ch. 591 5(2) +121,397
Federal Funds Ch. 591 5(3) +75,914
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
General Fund Ch. 544 1(1) +538,177
General Fund Ch. 544 1(2) +102,141
General Fund Ch. 544 1(3) +9,087
Other Funds Ch. 544 2(1) +1,205,552
Other Funds Ch. 544 2(2) +576,455
Other Funds Ch. 544 2(3) +682,964
Other Funds Ch. 544 2(4) +5,542
Lottery Funds Ch. 544 3(1) +88,362
Lottery Funds Ch. 544 3(2) +21,167
Lottery Funds Ch. 544 3(3) +4,216
Federal Funds Ch. 544 4(1) +1,609,135
Federal Funds Ch. 544 4(2) +486,614
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 40
Federal Funds Ch. 544 4(3) +137,344
State Forestry Department:
General Fund Ch. 592 1(1) +51,320
General Fund Ch. 592 1(2) +700,688
General Fund Ch. 592 1(3) +416,778
Other Funds Ch. 592 2(1) +480,901
Other Funds Ch. 592 2(2) +1,091,299
Other Funds Ch. 592 2(3) +1,687,298
Other Funds Ch. 592 2(4) +385,070
Other Funds Ch. 592 2(7) +164,703
Federal Funds Ch. 592 4(1) +43,829
Federal Funds Ch. 592 4(2) +98,401
Federal Funds Ch. 592 4(3) +1,920
Federal Funds Ch. 592 4(4) +105,906
Department of Land
Conservation and
Development:
General Fund Ch. 565 1(1) +179,264
Other Funds Ch. 565 2 +50,716
Federal Funds Ch. 565 3 +65,882
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund Ch. 548 1 +180,190
Department of
State Police:
General Fund Ch. 581 1(1) +1,575,151
General Fund Ch. 581 1(2) +125,426
General Fund Ch. 581 1(3) +146,605
General Fund Ch. 581 1(4) +3,155,089
Other Funds Ch. 581 2(1) +622,753
Other Funds Ch. 581 2(2) +252,710
Other Funds Ch. 581 2(3) +12,419
Other Funds Ch. 581 2(4) +900,952
Federal Funds Ch. 581 3(1) +10,287
Federal Funds Ch. 581 3(2) +7,591
Federal Funds Ch. 581 3(3) -557
Federal Funds Ch. 581 3(4) +7,075
Lottery Funds Ch. 581 4 +76,711
Department of Corrections:
General Fund Ch. 573 1(1) +21,524,617
General Fund Ch. 573 1(2) +2,457,908
General Fund Ch. 573 1(3) +1,154,665
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 41
General Fund Ch. 573 1(4) +477,296
Other Funds Ch. 573 2(1) +78,085
Other Funds Ch. 573 2(2) +186,114
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 505 1 +95,330
Federal Funds Ch. 505 3 +8,357
Department of Justice,
for district attorneys:
General Fund Ch. 535 10 +113,730
Department of Justice:
General Fund Ch. 654 10 +8,038
General Fund Ch. 576 1(2) +6,024
General Fund Ch. 576 1(3) +117,436
General Fund Ch. 576 1(4) +37,885
General Fund Ch. 576 1(6) +597,530
Other Funds Ch. 576 2(1) +675,705
Other Funds Ch. 576 2(2) +417,107
Other Funds Ch. 576 2(3) +1,528,501
Other Funds Ch. 576 2(4) +253,040
Other Funds Ch. 576 2(5) +107,164
Other Funds Ch. 576 2(6) +925,501
Other Funds Ch. 576 2(7) +565,280
Other Funds Ch. 576 2(8) +393,137
Federal Funds Ch. 576 3(1) +110,185
Federal Funds Ch. 576 3(2) +27,745
Federal Funds Ch. 576 3(3) +62,215
Federal Funds Ch. 576 3(4) +1,925,818
Oregon Military Department:
General Fund Ch. 566 1(1) +71,986
General Fund Ch. 566 1(2) +9,181
General Fund Ch. 566 1(3) +37,682
Other Funds Ch. 566 2(1) +61,609
Other Funds Ch. 566 2(2) +106,049
Other Funds Ch. 566 2(3) +168,474
Other Funds Ch. 566 2(4) +80,721
Federal Funds Ch. 566 3(1) +1,240,353
Federal Funds Ch. 566 3(2) +170,407
Federal Funds Ch. 566 3(3) +327,102
Department of Public Safety
Standards and Training:
Other Funds Ch. 583 2(1) +912,379
Federal Funds Ch. 583 3 +4,396
Oregon Youth Authority:
General Fund Ch. 588 1(1) +5,152,750
Other Funds Ch. 588 2 -64,327
Federal Funds Ch. 588 3 +162,100
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 42
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Other Funds Ch. 95 1(1) +57,325
Other Funds Ch. 95 1(2) +11,096
Other Funds Ch. 95 1(3) +4,140
Federal Funds Ch. 95 2(1) +10,782
Department of Transportation:
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(2) +6,811,666
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(3) +283,266
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(4) +519,271
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(5) +587,459
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(6) +652,423
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(7) +1,783,520
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(8) +1,082,525
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(9) +3,963,150
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(10) +1,517,067
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(11) +1,346,961
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(12) +83,287
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(13) +153,731
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(14) +78,773
Other Funds Ch. 604 4(15) +2,644,212
Federal Funds Ch. 604 5(2) +18,905
Federal Funds Ch. 604 5(5) +38,533
SECTION 181. This 2018 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 43
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5201 (HB 5201-A) Page 44